Washington statutes.
RCW 19.146.904

Implementation of act—2006 c 19.

The director of the department of financial institutions or the director's designee may take such steps as are necessary to ensure that chapter 19, Laws of 2006 is implemented on January 1, 2007.

[ 2006 c 19 s 23.]